th: ระดับการจับคู่ไข่มุก: ไล่ระดับ; เข้าชุดกัน; เกือบเข้าชุดกัน; ไม่เข้าชุดกัน/คละ; อื่นๆ
fr: Niveau d’assortiment des perles: En chute; Assorti; Presque assorti; Non assorti/mixte; Autre
sk-SK: Úroveň zladenia perál: Odstupňované; Zladené; Takmer zladené; Nezladené/zmiešané; Iné
tr: İnci eşleştirme seviyesi: Dereceli; Eşleşen; Neredeyse eşleşen; Eşleşmeyen/karışık; Diğer
ko: 진주 매칭 수준: 그래듀에이티드; 매치드; 니어 매치드; 언매치드/믹스드; 기타
zh-CN: 珍珠匹配等级: 渐变; 匹配; 近乎匹配; 不匹配/混合; 其他
el: Επίπεδο αντιστοίχισης μαργαριταριών: Διαβαθμισμένο; Ταιριαστό; Σχεδόν ταιριαστό; Αταίριαστο/μικτό; Άλλο
ja: 真珠のマッチングレベル: グラデーション; マッチ; ニアマッチ; アンマッチ/ミックス; その他
fi: Helmien yhtenäisyysaste: Porrastettu; Yhteensovitetut; Lähes yhteensovitetut; Yhteensovittamattomat/sekoitetut; Muu
sl-SI: Raven usklajenosti biserov: Stopnjevano; Ujemajoče; Skoraj ujemajoče; Neujemajoče/mešano; Drugo
pl: Poziom dopasowania pereł: Stopniowane; Dopasowane; Prawie dopasowane; Niedopasowane/mieszane; Inne
vi: Mức độ phù hợp của ngọc trai: Kích thước chuyển dần; Đồng đều; Gần đồng đều; Không đồng đều/hỗn hợp; Khác
nb: Perlematchingsnivå: Gradert; Matchet; Nesten matchet; Ikke matchet / blandet; Annet
hr-HR: Razina podudaranja bisera: Stupnjevano; Usklađeno; Gotovo usklađeno; Neusklađeno / miješano; Ostalo
es: Nivel de coincidencia de perlas: Graduado; Igualado; Casi igualado; No igualado/mixto; Otro
bg-BG: Степен на съответствие на перлите: Градуирани; Съвпадащи; Почти съвпадащи; Несъвпадащи/смесени; Други
it: Livello di abbinamento delle perle: A scalare; Abbinato; Quasi abbinato; Non abbinato/misto; Altro
de: Übereinstimmungsgrad der Perlen: Verlaufend; Passend; Nahezu passend; Unpassend/Gemischt; Sonstige
zh-TW: 珍珠匹配等級: 漸層; 匹配; 近乎匹配; 不匹配/混合; 其他
cs: Úroveň shody perly: Odstupňovaný; Sladěný; Téměř sladěný; Nesladěný/smíšený; Ostatní
pt-PT: Nível de correspondência de pérolas: Em graduação; Combinadas; Quase combinadas; Não combinadas/mistas; Outro
ru: Уровень подбора жемчуга: Градуированный (по размеру); Идеально подобранный; Почти подобранный; Неподобранный/смешанный; Другое
lt-LT: Perlų suderinamumo lygis: Palaipsninis; Suderintas; Beveik suderintas; Nesuderintas / mišrus; Kita
sv: Pärlmatchningsnivå: Graderad; Matchad; Nästan matchad; Omatchad/blandad; Övrigt
da: Perlematchningsniveau: Gradueret; Matchende; Næsten matchende; Umatchede/blandet; Andet
en: Pearl matching level: Graduated; Matched; Near matched; Unmatched/mixed; Other
pt-BR: Pérola nível de correspondência: Em graduação; Combinadas; Quase combinadas; Não combinadas/mistas; Outro
ro-RO: Nivel de potrivire a perlelor: În degrade; Asortate; Aproape asortate; Neasortate/mixte; Altele
hu: Gyöngyillesztés szintje: Növekvő; Egyező; Közel egyező; Nem egyező / vegyes; Egyéb
nl: Parel matchingniveau: Gegradueerd; Passend; Bijna passend; Ongepaard/gemengd; Overig